Iowa, session 2025-2026, 1419XD.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA:
TLSB 1419XD (8) 91
da/jh

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Section 1. NEW SECTION. 9.9 Removal of business entity
information not authorized to be provided.
1. Title XII. This section applies to Title XII of the
Code.
2. Affidavit of unauthorized use. A person whose name,
street address, mailing address, or electronic mail address
has, without that person’s authorization, been provided to the
secretary of state as that of the registered agent or of the
principal office in a business entity filing may deliver to the
secretary of state a notarized, sworn affidavit that identifies
the business entity registration by name and business number,
indicates the affiant’s mailing address, and states that
neither the affiant nor any agent of the affiant has authorized
the filing identifying the affiant as registered agent,
providing the affiant’s street address or mailing address as
an address of the registered agent or principal office, or
providing the affiant’s electronic mail address as that of the
registered agent. The affiant shall specify in the affidavit
the information that was not authorized to be provided. The
secretary of state may reject an affidavit that is incomplete
or that the secretary believes was delivered to the secretary
with the intent to harass or defraud the business entity or
the individual named as affiant. The office of the secretary
of state shall adopt a form of affidavit for use under this
section.
3. Administrative review. The secretary of state shall
conduct an administrative review to determine whether the
filing was authorized to identify the stated information as
applicable.
4. Statement of removal by secretary of state. If the
secretary of state concludes that the filing was not authorized
to provide the information identified in the affidavit, the
secretary of state shall promptly file a statement of removal
with respect to identified information, and shall promptly
cause the identified information to cease to be listed as
LSB 1419XD (8) 91
-1- da/jh 1/4

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
identified for the business entity.
5. No fee charged or refunded. The secretary of state
shall not charge a fee for the filing of an affidavit under
subsection 2 or a statement of removal under subsection 4. The
filing office shall not return any fee paid for filing the
business entity filing identified in the affidavit.
6. Notice of statement of removal. Upon filing a statement
of removal, the secretary of state shall send to the principal
office address or registered agent’s mailing address on
record for the business entity, if any, a notice stating that
the statement of removal has been filed and is effective
immediately. The notice shall also state that the business
entity is without a registered agent or registered agent
address, as applicable.
7. The secretary may adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A
necessary or desirable to administer this section.
Sec. 2. NEW SECTION. 486A.105B Secretary of state ——
affidavit of unauthorized use.
A person whose name, street address, mailing address,
or electronic mail address has, without that person’s
authorization, been provided to the secretary of state as that
of the registered agent or of the principal office in a record
delivered for filing under this chapter may submit an affidavit
as provided in section 9.9 stating that the information was not
authorized to be provided.
Sec. 3. NEW SECTION. 488.206B Secretary of state ——
affidavit of unauthorized use.
A person whose name, street address, mailing address,
or electronic mail address has, without that person’s
authorization, been provided to the secretary of state as that
of the registered agent or of the principal office in a record
delivered for filing under this chapter may submit an affidavit
as provided in section 9.9 stating that the information was not
authorized to be provided.
Sec. 4. NEW SECTION. 489.122B Secretary of state ——
LSB 1419XD (8) 91
-2- da/jh 2/4

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
affidavit of unauthorized use.
A person whose name, street address, mailing address,
or electronic mail address has, without that person’s
authorization, been provided to the secretary of state as that
of the registered agent or of the principal office in a record
delivered for filing under this chapter may submit an affidavit
as provided in section 9.9 stating that the information was not
authorized to be provided.
Sec. 5. NEW SECTION. 490.120B Secretary of state ——
affidavit of unauthorized use.
A person whose name, street address, mailing address,
or electronic mail address has, without that person’s
authorization, been provided to the secretary of state as that
of the registered agent or of the principal office in a record
delivered for filing under this chapter may submit an affidavit
as provided in section 9.9 stating that the information was not
authorized to be provided.
Sec. 6. NEW SECTION. 499.44B Secretary of state ——
affidavit of unauthorized use.
A person whose name, street address, mailing address,
or electronic mail address has, without that person’s
authorization, been provided to the secretary of state as that
of the registered agent or of the principal office in a record
delivered for filing under this chapter may submit an affidavit
as provided in section 9.9 stating that the information was not
authorized to be provided.
Sec. 7. NEW SECTION. 501.105B Secretary of state ——
affidavit of unauthorized use.
A person whose name, street address, mailing address,
or electronic mail address has, without that person’s
authorization, been provided to the secretary of state as that
of the registered agent or of the principal office in a record
delivered for filing under this chapter may submit an affidavit
as provided in section 9.9 stating that the information was not
authorized to be provided.
LSB 1419XD (8) 91
-3- da/jh 3/4

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Sec. 8. NEW SECTION. 501A.201B Secretary of state ——
affidavit of unauthorized use.
A person whose name, street address, mailing address,
or electronic mail address has, without that person’s
authorization, been provided to the secretary of state as that
of the registered agent or of the principal office in a record
delivered for filing under this chapter may submit an affidavit
as provided in section 9.9 stating that the information was not
authorized to be provided.
Sec. 9. NEW SECTION. 504.111B Secretary of state ——
affidavit of unauthorized use.
A person whose name, street address, mailing address,
or electronic mail address has, without that person’s
authorization, been provided to the secretary of state as that
of the registered agent or of the principal office in a record
delivered for filing under this chapter may submit an affidavit
as provided in section 9.9 stating that the information was not
authorized to be provided.